Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.270

Powers of remaining personal representatives if letters to associates revoked or surrendered or upon disqualification.

If more than one personal representative of an estate is serving when the letters to any of them are revoked or surrendered or when any part of them dies or in any way becomes disqualified, those who remain shall perform all the duties required by law unless the decedent provided otherwise in a duly probated will or unless the court orders otherwise.

[ 1997 c 252 s 5; 1965 c 145 s 11.28.270. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 76; RRS s 1446; prior: Code 1881 s 1427; 1854 p 273 s 38.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.